Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 4. Administrative Provisions.

§ 51.1-1171.
Supplemental benefits for catastrophic disability.

Disability benefits shall be increased to 80 percent of creditable compensation for any disabled participating employee who (i) is unable to perform at least two of the six activities of daily living due to a loss of functional capacity or (ii) requires substantial supervision to protect the employee from threats to health and safety as a result of severe cognitive impairment. Determination of whether a participating employee satisfies either of these conditions shall be made in accordance with the policies of the Board or its designee.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

§ 51.1-1172.
Employer contributions during disability absences.

Mandatory employer contributions to the defined contribution component of the hybrid retirement program pursuant to subdivision B 2 of §

51.1-169

on behalf of a participating employee shall be made for each employee who is permanently and totally disabled (as defined in § 22(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code). The calculation of such contributions shall be based on the full amount of the participating employee’s creditable compensation.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1173.
Health insurance coverage during disability absences.

Participating employees enrolled in a health insurance plan shall (i) continue to be covered during periods of short-term disability and (ii) have the option of continuing to be covered by such plan during periods of absence covered by long-term disability benefits, but only to the extent such health insurance coverage is provided by the employers of such participating employees.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823; 2013, c. 463.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 rewrote the section.

§ 51.1-1174.
Life and accident insurance coverage during disability absences.

Participating employees participating in a group life and accident insurance program established pursuant to Chapter 5 (§

51.1-500

et seq.) shall continue to participate in such program during periods of absence covered by short-term and long-term disability benefits.

During periods of absence covered by short-term disability benefits, the amount of the life insurance benefit shall be based on the annual salary of the participating employee at the commencement of the disability and shall be adjusted to include salary increases awarded during the period covered by short-term disability benefits.

During periods of absence covered by long-term disability benefits, the amount of the life insurance benefit shall be based on the annual salary of the participating employee at the commencement of the disability. Such amount shall not include salary increases awarded during the period covered by long-term disability benefits.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1175.
Optional insurance during disability absences.

Participating employees may continue coverage under the optional insurance for themselves and their spouses and minor dependents pursuant to §

51.1-512

at their own expense during periods of disability.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1176.
Exclusions and limitations.

Disability benefits shall not be payable to any participating employee (i) whose disability results from the employee’s commission of a felony or (ii) during any period when the employee is incarcerated.

Long-term disability benefits shall not be payable to any participating employee whose disability results from the abuse of alcohol, the misuse of any prescribed medication, or the misuse of any controlled substance, unless the employee is actively receiving treatment and, in the judgment of the case manager, is fully complying with the treatment plan and is making substantial progress toward rehabilitation.

Disability benefits shall not be payable if the participating employee is determined by the Board or its designee to be noncompliant with the program.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1177.
Appeals.

The Board may elect to develop an alternative to the process set forth in the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to allow appeals of case decisions related to the payment of disability benefits under this chapter. This alternative process shall be modeled after the claims provisions as provided for in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, and shall (i) provide for adequate notice in writing to any participant whose claim for benefits has been denied setting forth the specific reasons for such denial and (ii) afford a reasonable opportunity to any participant whose claim for benefits has been denied for a review of the decision denying the claim. Articles 3 (§

2.2-4018

et seq.) and 4 (§

2.2-4024

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act shall not apply to any portion of this alternative appeals process.

However, any person aggrieved by, and claiming the unlawfulness of, a final case decision issued pursuant to this alternative appeals process, whether issued by the Board or by the Board’s delegate, shall have a right to seek judicial review thereof. Such judicial review shall be in accordance with Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1178.
Board authorized to provide long-term care insurance and benefits.

For purposes of this section, “participating employee” means the same as that term is defined in §

51.1-1150

.

The Board is authorized to develop, implement, and administer a long-term care insurance program for participating employees. The Board may contract for and purchase such long-term care insurance or may self-insure long-term care benefits or may use such other actuarially sound funding necessary to effectuate such long-term care insurance and benefits.

Employers of participating employees shall pay to the Board contribution amounts, to be determined by the Board, to provide the Board with such funds as shall be required from time to time to (i) obtain and maintain long-term care insurance and benefits for participating employees and (ii) administer the long-term care insurance program, including providing case management and cost containment programs. Contributions shall be deposited in the Hybrid Retirement Program Disability Insurance Trust Fund established under §

51.1-1183

.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1179.
Limitation on coverage.

No person shall have more than one coverage under a disability benefit program. Any person employed in more than one position that provides coverage under a disability benefit program shall elect one position on which his coverage shall be based by written notification to the Board. No person shall receive more than one disability benefit under this chapter at the same time.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1180.
Keeping records and furnishing information required by Board.

Each employer whose employees are covered under the provisions of this chapter shall keep records and furnish information required by the Board.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1181.
Benefits exempt from process.

The benefits provided for in this chapter and all proceeds therefrom shall be exempt from levy, garnishment, attachment, and other legal process.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1182.
Policies to provide for accounting to Board; advance premium deposit reserve.

Each insurance product purchased by the Board or contract for administrative services related to a self-funded product shall provide for an accounting to the Board not later than 120 days after the end of each product year. For an insurance product, the accounting shall include (i) the amounts of premiums actually accrued under the policy during the policy year, (ii) the total amount of all claim charges incurred during the policy year, and (iii) the amount of fees accrued under the policy during the year plus the total amount of all claim charges incurred during the policy year. For a self-insured product, the accounting shall include the total amount of all claim charges incurred during the product year, the total amount of third-party administrator expenses, and the total amount of other charges for administrative services.

Any portion of the excess of the total of clause (i) of subsection A over clause (iii) of subsection A may, with the approval of the Board, be held by the insurance company in an advance premium deposit reserve to be used by the company for charges under the policy only. Any expenses incurred by the Board in connection with the administration of the disability benefits provisions of the program may be deducted from the advance premium deposit reserve. The advance premium deposit reserve shall bear interest at a rate to be determined in advance of each policy year by the insurance company. The rate shall be subject to Board approval as being consistent with the rates generally used by the company for similar funds held under other disability insurance policies. Any portion of the excess not held by the insurance company shall be held by the Board to be used for charges under the policy only. If the Board determines that the advance premium deposit reserve, together with any portion of the excess accumulated and held by the Board, has attained an amount estimated to make satisfactory provision for adverse fluctuations in future charges under the policy, any further excess shall inure to the benefit of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions as determined by the Board.

For purposes of this section, the insurance company may combine and consolidate the policies issued by it as directed by the Board.

History.

2012, cc. 701, 823.

§ 51.1-1183.
Funding of program; Hybrid Retirement Program Disability Insurance Trust Fund established.

The costs of providing short-term disability benefits shall be paid by the respective employers of participating employees. Employers that are state agencies shall pay such costs from funds as shall be appropriated by law to state agencies.

Employers of participating employees shall pay to the Board contribution amounts, to be determined by the Board, to provide the Board with such funds as shall be required from time to time to (i) obtain and maintain long-term disability insurance policies under this chapter and (ii) administer the Program, including providing case management and cost containment programs. Employers that are state agencies shall make such contributions from funds as shall be appropriated by law to state agencies. Contributions shall be deposited in the Hybrid Retirement Program Disability Insurance Trust Fund.

There is hereby established the Hybrid Retirement Program Disability Insurance Trust Fund. The costs incurred by the Board in providing policies of long-term disability insurance and administering the Program and in administering the long-term care insurance program established under §

51.1-1178

, including the provision of case management and cost containment programs, shall be withdrawn from time to time by the Board from the Hybrid Retirement Program Disability Insurance Trust Fund. The funds of the Hybrid Retirement Program Disability Insurance Trust Fund shall be deemed separate and independent trust funds, shall be segregated from all other funds of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, and shall be invested and administered solely in the interests of the participating employees and beneficiaries thereof. Neither the General Assembly nor any public officer, employee, or agency shall use or authorize the use of such trust funds for any purpose other than as provided in law for benefits, refunds, and administrative expenses, including but not limited to legislative oversight of the Hybrid Retirement Program Disability Insurance Trust Fund.

History.

2012, c. 701; 2012, c. 823.